Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-202
Statement of policy.

It is the policy of this state to ensure that all subscribers are protected from the unauthorized switching of a telecommunications company selected by the subscriber to provide telecommunications service.

Laws 1999, LB 150, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1902;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 64.